Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 3. Employment and Training of Prisoners.
§ 53.1-61.
Determination whether prisoner has dependents receiving public assistance; payment of portion of earnings; remedies for enforcement of support obligation.

In order to determine whether a prisoner to be released for employment as provided in §

53.1-60

has dependents receiving public assistance benefits, the Director may require such person to reveal the identity and residence of any dependents as a condition to release. The Director shall notify any such dependents, the local department of social services where such dependents reside and the Commissioner of Social Services of the release of such person for employment. Upon request of the local department of social services or the Commissioner of Social Services, the Director shall withhold and pay over a portion of the person’s earnings as provided in §

53.1-60

.

If the local department of social services or the Commissioner of Social Services objects to the amount withheld by the Director, the balance credited to the person’s account shall be subject to all civil remedies provided by law to the local department of social services or the Commissioner of Social Services for the enforcement of support of dependents receiving public assistance benefits.

The director of the local department of social services and the Commissioner of Social Services or their designees shall be permitted access to the records of the Director concerning the earnings of the prisoner.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-38.01; 1978, c. 660; 1982, c. 636; 2002, c. 747.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Commissioner of Social Services” was substituted for “Commissioner of the State Department of Social Services” throughout this section to conform to Acts 2016, c. 426.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted “public assistance benefits” for “welfare benefits” in the first sentence in subsection A and at the end of subsection B; and substituted “local department of social services” for “department of welfare or social services for the locality” in the second sentence in subsection A and for “local department of welfare or social services” throughout the rest of the section.

§ 53.1-62.
When ineligible for work release.

Any person who is released from confinement for work release employment pursuant to the provisions of §

53.1-60

, who is convicted of a felony included within Chapter 4 (§

18.2-30

et seq.) of Title 18.2, or arson, burglary or robbery committed while so released, shall, after such conviction, be ineligible for work release employment during the remainder of the sentence or sentences imposed upon him prior to his release for work release employment.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-38.1; 1976, c. 210; 1982, c. 636.